Wisconsin, session 2025, AB437.
do enact as follows:AB437,13Section 1. 100.10 of the statutes is created to read:AB437,1,44100.10 Tariff information required. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB437,1,65(a) “Consumer good” has the meaning given for “consumer goods or services” 6in s. 100.305 (1) (a).AB437,2,21(b) “Retailer” means a person that, in the preceding calendar year, sold a total 2amount of consumer goods the gross value of which was $3,000,000 or more.AB437,2,43(c) “Sales invoice” means a paper or electronic document that lists consumer 4goods to be sold and the consumer goods’ prices.AB437,2,65(d) “Sales receipt” means a paper or electronic document that lists consumer 6goods sold and the consumer goods’ prices at the time of sale.AB437,2,97(2) Requirement. (a) A retailer shall provide to a person purchasing a 8consumer good a sales invoice or sales receipt that clearly states the total cost of any 9tariff imposed on the sale of that consumer good.AB437,2,1010